Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 9. Mississippi Housing Finance Corporation
[Repealed].

§§ 43-33-501 through 43-33-505.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 35, eff from and after September 1, 1989.

§43-33-501. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 1]

§43-33-503. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 476, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 517, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 439, § 1]

§43-33-505. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 476, § 2; Laws, 1982, ch. 399, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 517, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 468, § 2; Laws, 1986, ch. 439, § 2]

§ 43-33-507.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1991, ch. 528, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

[Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 4(1); Laws, 1981, ch. 476, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 517, § 3; Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 3; Laws, 1990, ch. 335, § 1]

§§ 43-33-509 through 43-33-523.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 35, eff from and after September 1, 1989.

§43-33-509. [Laws, 1980, ch 484, § 4(2) ]

§43-33-511. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 4(3) ]

§43-33-513. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 4(4) ]

§43-33-515. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 4(5); Laws, 1981, ch. 476, § 4; Laws, 1984, ch. 517, § 4]

§43-33-517. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 5; Laws, 1981, ch. 476, § 5; Laws, 1982, ch. 399 § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 517, § 5; Laws, 1986, ch. 439, § 3]

§43-33-519. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 6; Laws, 1981, ch. 476, § 6; Laws, 1984, ch. 517, § 6]

§43-33-521. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 7; Laws, 1981, ch. 476, § 7; Laws, 1982, ch. 399, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 517, § 7; Laws, 1986, ch. 439, § 4]

§43-33-522. [Laws, 1986, ch. 439, § 5]

§43-33-523. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 8(1); Laws, 1981, ch. 476, § 8; Laws, 1984, ch. 517, § 8]

§ 43-33-525.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1984, ch. 517, § 18, eff from and after May 21, 1984.

[Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 8(2) ]

§§ 43-33-527 through 43-33-583.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1989, ch. 525, § 35, eff from and after September 1, 1989.

§43-33-527. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 8(3); Laws, 1981, ch. 476, § 9; Am, Laws, 1984, ch. 517, § 9]

§43-33-529. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 8(4) ]

§43-33-531. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 8(5); Laws, 1981, ch. 476, § 10]

§43-33-533. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 9; Am, Laws, 1989, ch. 464, § 2]

§43-33-535. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 10]

§43-33-537. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 11(1); Laws, 1981, ch. 476, § 11; Laws, 1982, ch. 399, § 4; Laws, 1983, ch. 538; Laws, 1984, ch. 517, § 10; Laws, 1984, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 23; Laws, 1985, ch. 468, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 464, § 1]

§43-33-539. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 11(2) ]

§43-33-541. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 11(3); Laws, 1981, ch. 476, § 12; Laws, 1984, ch. 517, § 11; Laws, 1986, ch. 439, § 6]

§43-33-543. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 12(1); Laws, 1981, ch. 476, § 13; Laws, 1984, ch. 517, § 12]

§43-33-545. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 12(2) ]

§43-33-547. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 12(3); Laws, 1981, ch. 476, § 14; Laws, 1984, ch. 517, § 13]

§43-33-549. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 12(4); Laws, 1981, ch. 476, § 15; Laws, 1984, ch. 517, § 14]

§43-33-551. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 12(5) ]

§43-33-553. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 12(6); Laws, 1981, ch. 476, § 16]

§43-33-555. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 13; Laws, 1981, ch. 476, § 17; Laws, 1984, ch. 517, § 15]

§43-33-557. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 14; Laws, 1986, ch. 439, § 7]

§43-33-559. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 15]

§43-33-561. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 16]

§43-33-563. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 17]

§43-33-565. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 18]

§43-33-567. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 19; Laws, 1981, ch. 476, § 18; Laws, 1984, ch. 517, § 16; Laws, 1986, ch. 439, § 8]

§43-33-569. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 20; Laws, 1986, ch. 439, § 9]

§43-33-571. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 21; Laws, 1981, ch. 476, § 19]

§43-33-573. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 22; Laws, 1981, ch. 476, § 20; Laws, 1984, ch. 517, § 17]

§43-33-575. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 23]

§43-33-577. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 24]

§43-33-579. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 25]

§43-33-581. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 26]

§43-33-583. [Laws, 1980, ch. 484, § 27; Laws, 1986, ch. 439, § 10]